Maine, session 132, LD390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1015, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Contributions to candidate seeking nomination by petition; primary election
period. For the purposes of contribution limits under subsections 1 and 2-B applicable to
a candidate seeking nomination by petition, "any election," when referring to a primary
election, includes the period beginning on the day after the most recent general election for
the office that candidate is seeking and ending on the day of the primary election for that
office.
Page 1 - 132LR0058(03)